Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-17] Prohibition of distribution of
medical marijuana and medical marijuana products to minors; penalties.
(a) A person commits the offense of promoting medical marijuana or medical
marijuana products to a minor if the person intentionally or knowingly
distributes any amount of marijuana or manufactured marijuana products that
came from a dispensary or production center to a minor who is not a registered
qualifying patient.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a class B felony. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next